Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Article 2. Jointly Owned Cemeteries.

§ 57-28.
Cities and counties may establish.

Any city and county, or any number of cities and counties, may jointly purchase or otherwise acquire land for the purpose of improving and establishing a jointly owned cemetery or cemeteries, and the governing bodies of the cities and counties purchasing or acquiring land for joint cemetery purposes shall have the power to plan any such cemetery and amend and revise any plans so made, to determine the perpetual upkeep requirements of such cemetery and of perpetual upkeep lots therein, to fix the purchase price of all lots therein, and to designate pauper lots and lots with and without perpetual care.

History.

1944, p. 326; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 53a.

§ 57-29.
Trustees.

After acquiring and planning such cemetery or cemeteries, the circuit court of the county wherein the cemetery is located shall appoint not less than five nor more than nine trustees, who shall reside in the city or county, for the purpose of managing and controlling such cemetery. The trustees shall have the power to convey lots in the cemetery in accordance with the plan thereof, without authority of court, and to include in deeds of conveyance such reasonable restrictions and conditions as they deem advisable, and shall have all other powers granted by general law to trustees of cemeteries. Such trustees shall, before entering upon the performance of their duties, give bond with approved security and in such penalty as the court determines for the faithful performance of their duties.

History.

1944, p. 326; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 53a.

§ 57-30.
Funds from sale of lots and for perpetual upkeep.

The trustees shall, upon delivery of a deed for any lot or portion thereof, except a pauper lot, collect the purchase price and pay it to the designated treasurer of either the county or city establishing the cemetery. The amounts received from the sale of lots or portions thereof as herein determined shall be used by the city and county to pay for the cost of the land and improvements. All funds for perpetual upkeep shall be properly invested under the direction of the governing bodies of the city and county. The balance of the purchase price of lots or portions thereof, and so much of the income from invested perpetual care funds as may be needed, shall be paid annually to the trustees, to be used by them along with all other funds received by them for the maintenance, operation and upkeep of the cemetery and of the perpetual care lots therein.

History.

1944, p. 326; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 53a.